Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 23

Quality Management Board

Effective Dates. Acts 1991, No. 1166, § 13: Apr. 10, 1991. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventy-Eighth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that there is a need to implement quality management in state government and provide a method to document and analyze quality management projects. Therefore, to ensure that state government services are provided in an efficient manner, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

25-23-101 — 25-23-104. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning the Quality Management Board, were repealed by Acts 2001, No. 783, § 2. The sections were derived from the following sources:

25-23-102. Acts 1991, No. 1166, § 2.

25-23-104. Acts 1991, No. 1166, § 4.

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2009, No. 309, § 5: July 1, 2009. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission serves an important and valuable role in this state, that the commission requires restructuring to fulfill its functions and advance its goals, and that the ideal time to commence this restructuring is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2009.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

25-24-101. Creation — Members.

There is hereby created a commission to be known as the “Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission”.

The commission shall consist of thirteen (13) members as follows:

Five (5) members appointed by the Governor.

The Governor shall appoint one (1) member from each congressional district;

Four (4) members appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate.

The President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall appoint one (1) member from each congressional district; and

Four (4) members appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives.

The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall appoint one (1) member from each congressional district.

Of the initial appointments by the Governor:

One (1) member shall serve a term of one (1) year;

One (1) member shall serve a term of two (2) years;

One (1) member shall serve a term of three (3) years; and

Two (2) members shall serve terms of four (4) years;

Of the initial appointments by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate:

One (1) member shall serve a term of one (1) year;

One (1) member shall serve a term of two (2) years;

One (1) member shall serve a term of three (3) years; and

One (1) member shall serve a term of four (4) years.

Of the initial appointments by the Speaker of the House of Representatives:

One (1) member shall serve a term of one (1) year;

One (1) member shall serve a term of two (2) years;

One (1) member shall serve a term of three (3) years; and

One (1) member shall serve a term of four (4) years.

The appointing authority shall determine the lengths of terms of his or her initial appointees.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, all succeeding appointments shall be for terms of four (4) years.

The Governor shall select annually a chair from the membership of the commission.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(2) of this section, no member of the commission subject to a term limit shall serve more than two (2) terms.

Upon the conclusion of his or her initial appointment, an initial appointee to the commission subject to a term limit shall serve no more than two (2) additional terms.

Vacancies in the membership of the commission shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term by the appointing authority.

Members of the commission shall be subject to removal from office by the appointing authority when the actions or condition of a member shall be considered as good cause for removal.

“Good cause” means the same as defined in § 25-16-804.

A majority of the commission shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

Members of the commission shall serve without compensation but may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1993, No. 1216, § 1, provided, in part:

“At the first meeting of the commission, the members of the general public shall draw lots for terms so that four (4) members will serve for a term of one (1) year; four (4) members will serve for a term of two (2) years; and four (4) members will serve for a term of three (3) years.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1216, § 1; 1997, No. 250, § 242; 1997, No. 968, § 1; 2001, No. 1288, § 24; 2009, No. 309, § 1.

25-24-102. Duties.

The Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission shall have the following duties:

To promote racial harmony, understanding, respect, and goodwill among all citizens;

To promote principles of nonviolence, peace, and social justice;

To promote among the people of Arkansas, by appropriate activities, both awareness and appreciation of the civil rights movement and advocacy of the principles and legacy of Martin Luther King, Jr.;

To develop, coordinate, and advise the Governor and the General Assembly of appropriate ceremonies and activities throughout the state relating to the observance of Martin Luther King, Jr.'s birthday, including without limitation providing advice and assistance to local governments and private organizations with respect to the observance of Martin Luther King, Jr.'s birthday;

To receive donations and contributions from individuals and public and private organizations in order to carry out its responsibilities;

To establish a Martin Luther King, Jr. Youth Commission to educate young persons on the principles and legacy of Martin Luther King, Jr.

Members of the Martin Luther King, Jr. Youth Commission may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.; and

To enable the people of Arkansas to reflect on the life and teachings of Martin Luther King, Jr. through educational endeavors, cultural performances, exhibitions, and events that are multiethnic and family oriented.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted “peace, and social justice” in (2); inserted “including without limitation ... Martin Luther King, Jr.'s birthday” in (4); added (6) and (7); and made related changes.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1216, § 2; 2009, No. 309, § 2.

25-24-103. Staff of commission.

The Governor shall appoint the Director of the Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission.

The director shall serve at the pleasure of the Governor.

The director shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Education.

The Department of Education may employ staff and consultants on behalf of the commission as authorized by law and fix their compensation, duties, authority, and responsibilities.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment inserted (a), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment substituted “the Director” for “an executive director” in (a)(1); deleted “executive” preceding “director” in (a)(2); added (a)(3); and, in (b), substituted “Department of Education” for “commission” and inserted “on behalf of the Martin Luther King, Jr. Commission”.

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 250, § 243 and No. 914, § 31. The chapter was derived from the following sources:

25-25-101. Acts 1989, No. 810, §§ 1, 5; 1993, No. 488, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 1357, § 4.

25-25-102. Acts 1989, No. 810, §§ 6, 10; 1993, No. 488, §§ 3, 5.

25-25-103. Acts 1989, No. 810, §§ 7, 9; 1993, No. 488, § 4.

25-25-104. Acts 1989, No. 810, § 8.

Publisher's Notes. This subchapter was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 914, § 31. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

25-26-101. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 1.

25-26-102. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 2.

25-16-103. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 8; 1997, No. 250, § 244; 1997, No. 1354, § 44.

25-26-104. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 9.

25-26-105. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 11.

25-26-106. Acts 1995, No. 737, § 12.

Acts 1995, No. 737, § 1, is also codified as §10-3-1701.

For present law, see §25-4-101 et seq.

As to the resolution of conflicting legislation affecting a section, see §§1-2-207 and1-2-303.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2013, No. 308, § 6, provided: “This act applies retroactively to the following:

“(1)Information technology procured on or after July 30, 1999; and

“(2)Any upgrades or modifications to or replacement of information technology procured on or after July 30, 1999.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1999, No. 1227, § 7: effective and in force from the date of enactment. Acts 1999, No. 1227 was signed by the Governor on Apr. 8, 1999, and became effective July 30, 1999.

Acts 2013, No. 308, § 8: Mar. 11, 2013. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that because of current limitations in the commercial availability of information technology supporting accessibility for the blind or visually impaired, the strict limitations of Act 1227 of 1999 have unreasonably hindered or delayed the acquisition of information technology, which has resulted in an undue burden on state agencies; and that this act is immediately necessary because the efficient installation, upgrading, and modification of information technology is essential to the functioning of the state. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

The advent of the information age throughout the United States and around the world has resulted in lasting changes in information technology;

Use of interactive visual display devices by state and state-assisted organizations has become a widespread means of access for employees and the public to obtain information available electronically, but nonvisual access by speech, braille, or other appropriate means has been overlooked in the development of the latest information technology;

Presentation of electronic data solely in a visual format is a barrier to access by individuals who are blind or visually impaired, preventing them from participating on equal terms in crucial areas of life such as education and employment;

Alternatives, including both software and hardware adaptations, have been created so that interactive control of computers and use of the information presented is more likely to be available by both visual and nonvisual means; and

The goals of the state in obtaining and deploying the most advanced forms of information technology properly include universal access so that segments of society with particular needs, including without limitation individuals unable to use visual displays, will not be left out of the information age.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment, in (a)(2), substituted “devices” for “terminals,” “has become” for “is becoming” and “the deployment of” for “purchasing and deploying” and deleted “whether” following “nonvisual access”; substituted “more likely to be available” for “possible” in (a)(4); substituted “without limitation” for “but not limited to” in (a)(5); rewrote (b)(1); added “To the extent provided in this subchapter” at the beginning of(b)(2); and added (b)(3).

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1216, § 3; 2009, No. 309, § 3; 2019, No. 910, § 2387.

25-23-103. Acts 1991, No. 1166, §§ 3, 4; 1993, No. 1038, § 1; 2001, No. 1288, § 23.